North Carolina, session 2025, HB964.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-269(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) It shall be unlawful for any person willfully and intentionally to carry concealed about
his or her person any bowie knife, dirk, dagger, slung shot, loaded cane, metallic knuckles, razor,
shuriken, stun gun, or other deadly weapon of like kind, except when the person is on the person's
own premises.in any of the following circumstances:
(1) The person is on the person's own premises.
(2) The person has a concealed handgun permit issued in accordance with Article
54B of this Chapter, has a permit considered valid under G.S. 14-415.24, or is
exempted by law from obtaining a permit issued in accordance with Article
54B of this Chapter, and the person is not carrying the weapon when or where
carrying a concealed handgun is prohibited by law.
(3) The person is a military permittee, as defined under G.S. 14-415.10(2a), who
provides to the law enforcement officer proof of deployment, as required
under G.S. 14-415.11(a), and the person is not carrying the weapon when or
where carrying a concealed handgun is prohibited by law."
SECTION 2. G.S. 14-415.11 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c4) Any person who has a concealed handgun permit may carry concealed any weapon
described in G.S. 14-269(a), provided that the person is not carrying the weapon when or where
carrying a concealed handgun is prohibited by law."
SECTION 3. Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this
act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act
remain applicable to those prosecutions.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H964-v-1*